California statutes. Public Resources Code
(h) “Salton Sea Management Program” means the Natural Resources Agency, the Department of Water Resources, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife working under the direction of the Assistant Secretary for Salton Sea Policy to carry out the terms of State Water Resources Control Board Order WR 2017-0134.

(i) “Tribe” means any federally
 recognized Native American tribe or a nonfederally recognized Native American tribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Salton Sea Conservancy [33812. - 33813.]

33812.

(a) The Salton Sea Conservancy is hereby created as a state agency within the Natural Resources Agency for both of the following purposes:

(1) To operate, maintain, and manage projects, as they are completed, that are planned or built under the authority of the Salton Sea Management Program to fulfill the state’s obligations as detailed in State Water Resources Control Board Order WR 2017-0134.

(2) To acquire, hold, and manage land and property rights, including easements and water rights, within the Salton Sea region after restoration or mitigation projects are built.

(b) The conservancy’s jurisdiction is limited
 to the Salton Sea region.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33813.

The conservancy shall carry out programs, projects, and activities to further the conservancy’s purposes specified in Section 33812. This may include any one, any combination, or all of the following:

(a) Expending funds and awarding grants and loans to develop and implement programs and projects that are designed to further the conservancy’s purposes specified in Section 33812.

(b) Engaging community members and stakeholders.

(c) Identifying and working to resolve any barriers or impediments to the conservancy’s progress, including capacity or organizational deficiencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Governing Board [33814. - 33824.]

33814.

(a) By January 1, 2026, the conservancy shall be governed by a board of directors.

(1) The board shall consist of 15 voting members appointed as follows:

(A) One public member appointed by the Governor, who is not an elected official and who resides within 50 miles of the conservancy’s territory.

(B) One public member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, who is not an elected official and who resides within 50 miles of the conservancy’s territory.

(C) One public member appointed by the Senate
 Committee on Rules, who is not an elected official and who resides within 50 miles of the conservancy’s territory.

(D) One member who is appointed by the Riverside County Board of Supervisors and is a resident of that county, or their designee.

(E) One member who is appointed by the Imperial County Board of Supervisors and is a resident of that county, or their designee.

(F) One member who is appointed by the Coachella Valley Water District and resides within the district’s boundaries, or their designee.

(G) One member who is appointed by the Imperial Irrigation District and resides within the district’s boundaries, or their designee.

(H) One member who is appointed by the Torres Martinez
 Desert Cahuilla Indians, or their designee.

(I) One representative of a nongovernmental organization focused on environmental justice work in the region appointed by the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(J) One representative of a nongovernmental organization focused on fish and wildlife habitat work in the region appointed by the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(K) The Director of Finance, or the director’s designee.

(L) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, or the secretary’s designee.

(M) The Director of Fish and Wildlife, or the director’s designee.

(N) The Director of Water Resources, or the
 director’s designee.

(O) The Director of the Department of Parks and Recreation, or the director’s designee.

(2) The board shall also consist of seven ex officio nonvoting members designated as follows:

(A) The Secretary for Environmental Protection, or the secretary’s designee.

(B) The Chairperson of the State Water Resources Control Board, or the chairperson’s designee.

(C) The Chairperson of the State Air Resources Board, or the chairperson’s designee.

(D) One representative of the United States Bureau of Land Management, designated by the United States Secretary of the Interior.

(E) One representative of the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, designated by the United States Secretary of the Interior.

(F) One representative of the federal Bureau of Reclamation, designated by the United States Secretary of the Interior.

(G) One representative of the United States Army Corps of Engineers, designated by the United States Department of Defense.

(b) The local agencies specified in subparagraphs (D) to (G), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall ensure that one of the appointed members of those agencies is the president of the Salton Sea Authority, so that the president of the Salton Sea Authority is always represented on the board.

(c) The public members
 appointed by the Governor, the Senate Committee on Rules, and the Speaker of the Assembly, and the representatives of nongovernmental organizations appointed by the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, shall each serve a four-year term.

(d) The locally appointed members specified in subparagraphs (D) to (G), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing board of supervisors or water or irrigation district.

(e) The tribal representative shall serve at the pleasure of the Torres Martinez Desert Cahuilla Indians.

(f) Each voting member specified in subparagraphs (A) to (O), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall have demonstrated interest and expertise in at least one of the conservancy’s purposes described in subdivision (a) of Section 33812. This
 demonstrated interest and expertise shall include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Experience with any of the following:

(A) A land conservation nonprofit organization.

(B) A public agency focused on land conservation.

(C) Public land management.

(2) Experience as a professional with expertise in one or more functions of the board, including operations and maintenance.

(3) Experience with activities that benefit disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33815.

The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, or the secretary’s designee, shall serve as the chairperson of the board. The board’s voting members shall annually elect from among themselves a vice chairperson of the board. If the vice chairperson’s position becomes vacant, a new vice chairperson shall be elected by the board’s voting members to serve for the remainder of the term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33816.

Eight of the voting members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the conservancy. The board shall not transact the business of the conservancy if a quorum is not present at the time a vote is taken. A decision of the board requires an affirmative vote of eight of the voting membership, and the vote is binding with respect to all matters acted on by the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33817.

The board shall adopt rules and procedures for the conduct of business by the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33818.

The board may establish advisory boards or committees, hold community meetings, and engage in public outreach.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33819.

The board may maintain a headquarters office within the Salton Sea region. The conservancy may rent or own real and personal property and equipment pursuant to applicable statutes and regulations. The conservancy may also enter into access agreements, such as easements, to further the conservancy’s purposes described in subdivision (a) of Section 33812.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33820.

(a) Before January 1, 2027, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall appoint an executive officer of the conservancy. The executive officer shall be exempt from civil service.

 (b) On or after January 1, 2027, the board shall determine the qualifications of, and shall appoint, an executive officer of the conservancy, who shall be exempt from civil service. The board shall employ other staff as necessary to execute the powers and functions provided for in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33821.

The board may enter into contracts with private entities and public agencies to procure consulting and other services necessary to achieve the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33822.

The conservancy’s expenses for support and administration may be paid from the conservancy’s operating budget and any other funding sources available to the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33823.

The board shall conduct business in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33824.

The board shall hold its regular meetings within the Salton Sea region.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Powers, Duties, and Limitations [33825. - 33837.]

33825.

The Salton Sea Conservancy Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The Legislature intends to support the fund through authorized proceeds from the sale of bonds and allocations from the Salton Sea Lithium Fund pursuant to Section 2951 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33826.

The conservancy may engage in partnerships with tribes, nonprofit organizations, local public agencies, including the Salton Sea Authority, and landowners.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33827.

In implementing this division, the conservancy shall cooperate and consult with the city or county in which a grant is proposed to be expended or an interest in real property is proposed to be acquired, and shall, as necessary or appropriate, coordinate its efforts with the Salton Sea Authority, and with other state agencies, in cooperation with the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33828.

(a) The conservancy may require a grantee to enter into an agreement with the conservancy on terms and conditions specified by the conservancy.

(b) The conservancy may require a cost-share or local funding requirement for a grant. The conservancy may make that cost-share or local funding requirement contingent upon the total amount of funding available, the fiscal resources of the applicant, or the urgency of the project. The conservancy may waive cost-share requirements.

(c) The conservancy may fund or award grants for plans and feasibility studies consistent with its plans.

(d) The conservancy may seek repayment
 or reimbursement of funds granted on terms and conditions it deems appropriate. The proceeds of repayment shall be deposited in the fund.

(e) The conservancy may require any funds that exceed the costs of eligible or approved projects or of acquisition to be returned to the conservancy, to be available for expenditure when appropriated by the Legislature.

(f) The conservancy may award grant funds to state agencies, local public agencies, tribes, and nonprofit organizations to further the purposes of this division.

(g) The conservancy may provide advance payment of up to one-half of the total grant award for a project that satisfies both of the following criteria:

(1) The project proponent is a nonprofit organization or a disadvantaged community, or the
 project benefits a disadvantaged community.

(2) The total grant award for the project is less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33829.

(a) The conservancy may provide grants and loans to state agencies, local public agencies, tribes, and nonprofit organizations to further the purposes of this division.

(b) An entity applying for a grant from the conservancy to acquire an interest in real property shall specify all of the following in the grant application:

(1) The intended use of the property.

(2) The manner in which the land will be managed.

(3) How the cost of ongoing operations, maintenance, and management will be provided, including an analysis of the maintaining entity’s
 financial capacity to support those ongoing costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33830.

The conservancy may sue and be sued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33831.

(a) The conservancy may acquire from willing sellers or transferors, including state agencies, interests in real property, including access and water rights, and improve, lease, or transfer interests in real property, in order to carry out the purposes of this division.

(b) The conservancy may, before the completion of restoration or mitigation projects, enter into easements for property rights to be assigned to the conservancy after completion by the Salton Sea Management Program.

(c) The acquisition of an interest in real property under this section is not subject to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code). However, the conservancy may request the State Public Works Board to review and approve specific acquisitions. The conservancy may also request assistance in acquiring real property from the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33832.

The conservancy may enter into an agreement with a public agency, nonprofit organization, or private entity for the construction, management, or maintenance of facilities authorized by, or transferred to, the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33833.

The conservancy shall not exercise the power of eminent domain.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33834.

(a) The conservancy may pursue and accept funds from various sources, including, but not limited to, federal, state, and local funds or grants, gifts, donations, bequests, devises, subventions, grants, rents, royalties, or other assistance and funds from public and private sources.

(b) The conservancy may accept fees levied by others.

(c) The conservancy may create and manage endowments.

(d) All funds received by the conservancy shall be deposited in the fund for expenditure for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33835.

Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the conservancy shall prepare and submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, on its implementation of Sections 33812 and 33813, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A schedule of projects undertaken by the conservancy and a schedule of grants and loans made by the conservancy.

(b) A schedule of grants awarded to the conservancy and the disposition of the funds granted.

(c) The disposition of the funds
 appropriated to the conservancy in the fiscal year preceding the year in which the report is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33836.

(a) The conservancy may expend funds and award grants and loans to develop projects and programs that are designed to further the purposes of this division.

(b) The conservancy may provide and make available technical information, expertise, and other nonfinancial assistance to public agencies, nonprofit organizations, and tribal organizations, to support program and project development and implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33837.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit or alter any party’s, including the state’s, responsibility under existing law or any party’s authority to carry out any responsibility under existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Contingent Operation [33838. - 33838.]

33838.

This division shall become operative only if the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Act of 2024 (Chapter 83 of the Statutes of 2024) is approved by the voters at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 771, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 23.7. PRESERVATION OF FUTURE TRANSPORTATION OPTIONS [33910. - 33917.]

33910.

As used in this division, “department” means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

33911.

The department may receive donations of land and funds for the acquisition of land from local agencies, including special districts, and private entities. Land acquired by the department through donation, purchase, or by any other means, shall be maintained by the department for future transportation purposes. The acquisition of land by the department for that purpose is not subject to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) if the land, when received or acquired, is within a statewide or regional priority corridor designated pursuant to Section 65081.3 of the Government Code and the applicable regional transportation planning agency has complied with Section 33913 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

33912.

(a) Of the funds appropriated to the Department of Transportation by Section 161030 of the Public Utilities Code, all money remaining on July 1, 1993, that is neither encumbered nor needed by the department to comply with the terms of any offer to purchase property that was made to the owner on or before July 1, 1993, shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of this division.

(b) The proceeds of the sale of any property acquired pursuant to this division shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

33913.

Land may be acquired by the department if the land is located in a designated corridor of statewide or regional priority as determined pursuant to Section 65081.3 of the Government Code. Proposals by other entities for the acquisition of land by the department shall be submitted to the regional transportation planning agency in whose jurisdiction the land is located for review and recommended action, and be approved by the department. No proposal shall be approved by the department pursuant to this section unless the regional transportation planning agency, after a public hearing, finds that the range of potential transportation facilities to be located on the land can be constructed in a manner which will avoid or mitigate significant environmental impacts or values identified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c). The regional transportation planning agency is not required to comply with the California Environmental Quality Act in any manner, other than complying with the provisions of subdivision (a), in order to make this finding, if it has prepared an environmental review of the corridor of statewide or regional priority in which the land is located pursuant to Section 65081.3 of the Government Code. The regional transportation planning agency shall base its finding on a consideration of each of the following:

(a) The information contained in the environmental impact report prepared pursuant to Section 65081.3 of the Government Code and a document describing the proposed land acquisition which includes the content of an initial study described in subdivision (d) of Section 15063 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations (California Environmental Quality Act Guidelines). However, the study need not include greater specificity about the type or nature of the proposed transportation project than has been provided in action by the governing body of the project applicant agency.

(b) Review by the Department of Fish and Game. The Department of Fish and Game shall make the results of its review of the proposed land acquisition known to the regional transportation planning agency no later than 30 days after the acquisition is submitted to them by the regional transportation planning agency for review, or its comments shall not be considered in the finding.

(c) Other information submitted to the regional transportation planning agency in the public hearing or in writing regarding the proposed acquisition by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

33914.

The determinations made pursuant to this division shall not constitute the basis for a determination of compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act for purposes of constructing the transportation project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

33915.

The acquisition and holding of land under this division constitutes a public purpose, notwithstanding Section 1240.220 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

33916.

Nothing in this division limits the authority conferred on the department by Section 104.6 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

33917.

(a) A transportation planning agency, a county transportation commission, or a county transportation authority may create a transportation corridor preservation entity within the area of its jurisdiction and may create a corridor preservation account.

(b) Sections 33911, 33913, 33914, and 33915 apply to a transportation preservation entity created pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 24. RENEWABLE RESOURCES INVESTMENT PROGRAM [34000. - 34002.]

34000.

Money deposited in the Bosco-Keene Renewable Resources Investment Fund created by former Section 7150.6 of the Fish and Game Code may be encumbered, pursuant to appropriation by the Legislature, only for the following purposes:

(a) Salmon and steelhead hatchery expansion and fish habitat improvement.

(b) Forest resource improvement projects pursuant to the California Forest Improvement Act of 1978.

(c) Urban forestry projects pursuant to the California Urban Forestry Act of 1978.

(d) Agricultural soil drainage programs which will retard desertification and protect agricultural productivity.

(e) Support of technical assistance programs which will prevent soil erosion. 

(f) Agricultural, industrial, and urban water conservation programs.

(g) Wildland fire prevention programs pursuant to the Wildland Fire Protection and Resources Management Act of 1978, Article 1 (commencing with Section 4461) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 4475) of Chapter 7 of Part 2 of Division 4.

(h) Coastal resource enhancement projects pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 31251) of Division 21. 

(i) Regulation and oversight of surface mining activities pursuant to the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710) of Division 2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 25.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

34001.

The Department of Fish and Game may make grants to nonprofit organizations, political subdivisions of the state, and Indian tribes to cooperate with the department in salmon and steelhead rehabilitation along the north coast of California.

The Director of Fish and Game may establish criteria for the awarding of these grants to applicants who demonstrate the greatest expertise in accomplishing the salmon and steelhead rehabilitation projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

34002.

The Department of Fish and Game may provide nonprofit organizations and Indian tribes partial funding of grants provided under Section 34001 or Section 3 of Chapter 344 of the Statutes of 1981, if in the opinion of the department, any such organization meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Has a previously demonstrated record of successfully completing one or more salmon or steelhead rehabilitation projects funded under the Cooperative North Coast Salmon and Steelhead Restoration Project.

(b) Utilizes acceptable accounting procedures.

(c) Demonstrates that the project can be accomplished more efficiently and economically and with partial funding provided before the project’s completion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1686, Sec. 15.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 25. COASTAL RESOURCES AND ENERGY ASSISTANCE [35000. - 35034.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [35000. - 35003.]

35000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Coastal Resources and Energy Assistance Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35001.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is essential that the state, in cooperation with local governments, invest a portion of federal revenues derived from the extraction of publicly owned, nonrenewable offshore energy resources for the sound protection and management of the state’s renewable ocean and coastal resources.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35002.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the federal government’s accelerated and expanded federal offshore leasing program, in conjunction with the State Lands Commission’s submerged lands leasing program, have placed a greater strain on state and local government efforts to plan for and manage the ocean and coastal impacts caused by offshore oil and gas development.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35003.

The Legislature further finds and declares, therefor, that a portion of federal revenues derived from the extraction of offshore energy resources should be expended by the state to further the following goals:

(a) Provision of financial assistance to coastal counties and cities affected by federal and state offshore energy development. 

(b) Assistance to local governments to exercise their responsibility for improving the management of the state’s coastal resources.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [35020. - 35024.]

35020.

“Coastal city” means a city or port district which lies, in whole or in part, within the coastal zone.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35021.

“Coastal county” means a county or city and county which lies, in whole or in part, within the coastal zone.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35022.

“Coastal zone” means the coastal zone as defined in Section 30103.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35023.

“Local coastal program” means a local coastal program as defined in Section 30108.6.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35024.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of the Resources Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Coastal County and City Offshore Energy Assistance [35030. - 35034.]

35030.

(a) The secretary, after consulting with the California Coastal Commission and the State Lands Commission concerning offshore energy activities, shall award grants to coastal counties and cities to be used for the purposes of planning, assessment, mitigation, permitting, monitoring and enforcement, public services and facilities, and for other activities related to offshore energy development, consistent with the requirements of the state’s coastal management program. 

(b) Prior to receiving grants under this chapter, each coastal county and city shall submit a report to the secretary describing how the funds are to be expended. Before submitting the report, each coastal county and city shall provide opportunities for the public to review and comment on the report and shall hold at least one public hearing on the report.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35031.

Any funds appropriated in accordance with this chapter and not expended as described in Section 35030, may be awarded by the secretary for technical and financial assistance to coastal counties and cities with approved local coastal programs to help them exercise effectively their responsibility for improving the management of the state’s coastal resources. Technical and financial assistance shall be made available to coastal counties and cities to do any of the following:

(a) Protect wetlands, flood plains, estuaries, beaches, dunes, and fish and wildlife and their habitat within coastal areas. 

(b) Minimize the loss of life and property in coastal flood-prone, storm surge, geologic hazard, and erosion-prone areas.

(c) Provide public access to the coast for recreational purposes, to acquire coastal view sheds, and to preserve, maintain, and restore historic, cultural, and aesthetic coastal sites.

(d) Facilitate the process for siting major facilities along the coast related to fisheries, recreation, and ports and other coastal dependent commercial uses, giving full consideration to environmental concerns as well as the need for economic development. 

(e) Promote other coastal management improvements determined by the secretary to be consistent with the state’s coastal management program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 977, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

35032.

On or before April 15, 1997, the secretary, in cooperation with the California Coastal Commission, shall develop and implement a competitive application process to award coastal counties and cities financial and technical assistance pursuant to this chapter. Thereafter, the secretary shall review that process by April 15 of each year that funds are appropriated pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 977, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

35033.

Any financial assistance provided to local governments under this chapter may not exceed 90 percent of the cost of carrying out the project. Commencing in the 1997 calendar year and in each calendar year thereafter, 50 percent of the amount of funds received by the state pursuant to Section 8(g) of the Outer Continental Shelf Lands Act (43 U.S.C. Sec. 1337(g)) over the amount of funds so received in the 1996 calendar year shall be available, on an annual basis, for appropriation to the secretary for grants to coastal counties and cities pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 977, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

35034.

On an annual basis, the secretary shall review and assess county and city expenditures under this program. Not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of the funds appropriated annually pursuant to this chapter may be used by the secretary to defray administrative costs and, of that amount, not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) may be used to cover costs incurred by the California Coastal Commission in the review of grant applications pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 977, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 26. SANTA CLARA VALLEY OPEN-SPACE AUTHORITY [35100. - 35186.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [35100. - 35106.]

35100.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Santa Clara Valley Open-Space Authority Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 99, Sec. 2.   (SB 422)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35101.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In Santa Clara County, open-space preservation and creation of a greenbelt are immediate high priorities needed to counter the continuing and serious conversion of these lands to urban uses, to preserve the quality of life in the county, and to encourage agricultural activities.

(b) In order to deal in an expeditious manner with the current serious loss of these properties, the county needs to develop and implement a local funding program involving properties occupied for urban purposes which give rise to the need for open-space preservation
 that goes significantly beyond current existing funding
 that is not adequate to resolve these losses.

(c) It is in the public interest to create the Santa Clara Valley Open-Space Authority so that local open-space preservation and greenbelting decisions can be implemented in a timely manner to provide for the acquisition and maintenance of these properties.

(d) All persons owning developed parcels enjoy the privilege of using, and benefit from, the availability of open space.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 99, Sec. 3.   (SB 422)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35102.

“Agricultural activity” has the same meaning as “agricultural activity, operation, or facility, or appurtenances thereof” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 3482.5 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 822, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

35103.

“Authority” means the Santa Clara Valley Open-Space Authority created pursuant to this division in the County of Santa Clara.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 99, Sec. 4.   (SB 422)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35105.

“County” means the County of Santa Clara.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 822, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

35106.

“Governing board” means the governing body of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 822, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Creation of the Open-Space Authority [35120. - 35124.]

35120.

The Santa Clara Valley Open-Space Authority is hereby created on February 1, 1993. The maximum jurisdiction of the authority shall include all areas within the county, except those areas of the county presently within the boundaries, including the sphere of influence, of the Midpeninsula Regional Open-Space District. Each city situated within the maximum jurisdictional boundaries shall pass a resolution stating its intent to be included within the authority’s jurisdiction by January 15, 1993. These resolutions shall be transmitted to the board of
 supervisors.
 A city that fails to pass the resolution or that formally states its intent to not participate shall be excluded from the authority’s jurisdiction. The creation of the authority is not subject to review by the Santa Clara County Local Agency Formation Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 99, Sec. 5.   (SB 422)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35121.

(a) If, after the establishment of the authority’s boundaries pursuant to Section 35120, territory within the authority is annexed to a city which is outside the authority, that territory may be detached from the authority pursuant to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).
